District of Columbia statutes.
32-1331

Transitional employment program.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish and implement a program, subject to the annual appropriation of funds, to provide transitional employment for District of Columbia residents residing in persistent problem areas who face barriers to employment due to deficiencies in education, work experience, work training, work skills, prior incarceration, or the loss of certain occupations or industries from the economy of the District or the Washington Metropolitan Area.

(b)

For purposes of this section “persistent problem area” shall mean those areas of the District where such factors as crime, lack of economic development, and high unemployment create a particular need for the services of this program and which the Mayor may further identify by executive order.

(c)

At the time of entry into the program, participants shall be certified as to residence by the Department of Employment Services and assessed as to their readiness for placement in paid work positions. Based upon that assessment, a comprehensive service and case management plan shall be developed for each participant. Plans may include supportive services such as health care, childcare, counseling, financial management services, remedial education, and placement into wage paying jobs.

(d)

All jobs into which participants are placed shall pay stipends, training wages, or wages as the Mayor may determine are appropriate for the job and participant and shall last for a maximum of 12 months. Placements shall be made into jobs that provide participants the opportunity to obtain needed work experience and gain job skills, with the goal of a successful transition to unsubsidized employment.

(e)

All jobs into which participants are placed shall be the subject of an agreement between the Department of Employment Services and the worksite host providing that no regular employee will be displaced by program participants.

(f)

Program participants placed in jobs shall participate in placement activities during their work experience including periodic job search requirements, participation in peer support groups, job coaching, and other activities and services directed to placing participants in unsubsidized employment.

(g)

Participants may be provided with additional placement and supportive services for up to 6 months after the conclusion of their work experience jobs if these services are found to enhance the participants’ chances of obtaining or continuing in unsubsidized employment.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2102, 52 DCR 7503
Short title of subtitle H of title II of Law 16-33: Section 2101 of D.C. Law 16-33 provided that subtitle H of title II of the act may be cited as the Transitional Employment Program and Apprenticeship Initiative Establishment Act of 2005.
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2102 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
This section is referenced in § 1-328.05, § 2-219.01, and § 32-771.